California statutes. Family Code
An order for spousal support terminates at the end of the period provided in the order and shall not be extended unless the court retains jurisdiction in the order or under Section 4336.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4336.

(a) Except on written agreement of the parties to the contrary or a court order terminating spousal support, the court retains jurisdiction indefinitely in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or for legal separation of the parties where the marriage is of long duration.

(b) For the purpose of retaining jurisdiction, there is a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence that a marriage of 10 years or more, from the date of marriage to the date of separation, is a marriage of long duration. However, the court may consider periods of separation during the marriage in determining whether the marriage is in fact of long duration. Nothing in this subdivision precludes a court from determining that a marriage of less than 10 years is a marriage of long duration.

(c) Nothing in this section limits the court’s discretion to terminate spousal support in later proceedings on a showing of changed
 circumstances.

(d) This section applies to the following:

(1) A proceeding filed on or after January 1, 1988.

(2) A proceeding pending on January 1, 1988, in which the court has not entered a permanent spousal support order or in which the court order is subject to modification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4337.

Except as otherwise agreed by the parties in writing, the obligation of a party under an order for the support of the other party terminates upon the death of either party or the remarriage of the other party.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4338.

In the enforcement of an order for spousal support, the court shall resort to the property described below in the order indicated:

(a) The earnings, income, or accumulations of either spouse after the date of separation, as defined in Section 70, which would have been community property if the spouse had not been separated from the other spouse.

(b) The community property.

(c) The quasi-community property.

(d) The other separate property of the party required to make the
 support payments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 114, Sec. 5.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4339.

The court may order the supporting party to give reasonable security for payment of spousal support.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Payment to Court-Designated Officer; Enforcement by District Attorney [4350. - 4352.]

4350.

In any proceeding where a court makes or has made an order requiring the payment of spousal support, the court may direct that payment shall be made to the county officer designated by the court for that purpose. The court may include in its order made pursuant to this section any service charge imposed under the authority of Section 279 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4351.

(a) In a proceeding where the court has entered an order pursuant to Section 4350, the court may also refer the matter of enforcement of the spousal support order to the local child support agency. The local child support agency may bring those enforcement proceedings it determines to be appropriate.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), when the local child support agency is required to appear on behalf of a welfare recipient in a proceeding to enforce an order requiring payment of child support, the local child support agency shall also enforce any order requiring payment to the welfare recipient of spousal support that is in arrears.

(c) This section does not prohibit the district attorney or the local child support agency from bringing an action or initiating process to enforce or punish the failure to obey an order for spousal support under any law that empowers the district attorney or the local child support agency to bring an action or initiate a process, whether or not there has been a referral by the court pursuant to this chapter.

(d) Any notice from the district attorney or the local child support agency requesting a meeting with the support obligor for any purpose authorized under this part shall contain a statement advising the support obligor of the obligor’s right to have an attorney present at the meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 53.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4352.

(a) Insofar as expenses of the county officer designated by the court and expenses of the local child support agency incurred in the enforcement of an order referred by the court under this chapter exceed any service charge imposed under Section 279 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the expenses are a charge upon the county where the proceedings are pending.

(b) Fees for service of process in the enforcement of an order referred by the court under this chapter are a charge upon the county where the process is served.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 45.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Provision for Support After Death of Supporting Party [4360. - 4360.]

4360.

(a) For the purpose of Section 4320, where it is just and reasonable in view of the circumstances of the parties, the court, in determining the needs of a supported spouse, may include an amount sufficient to purchase an annuity for the supported spouse or to maintain insurance for the benefit of the supported spouse on the life of the spouse required to make the payment of support, or may require the spouse required to make the payment of support to establish a trust to provide for the support of the supported spouse, so that the supported spouse will not be left without means of support in the event that the spousal support is terminated by the death of the party required to make the payment of support.

(b) Except as otherwise agreed to by the parties in writing, an order made under this section may be modified or terminated at the discretion of the court at any time before the death of the party required to make the payment of
 support.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. SUPPORT OF PARENTS [4400. - 4414.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4400. - 4405.]

4400.

Except as otherwise provided by law, an adult child shall, to the extent of the adult child’s ability, support a parent who is in need and unable to self-maintain by work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 115, Sec. 54.   (AB 1817)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

4401.

The promise of an adult child to pay for necessaries previously furnished to a parent described in Section 4400 is binding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4402.

The duty of support under this part is cumulative and not in substitution for any other duty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4403.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b):

(1) A parent, or the county on behalf of the parent, may bring an action against the child to enforce the duty of support under this part.

(2) If the county furnishes support to a parent, the county has the same right as the parent to whom the support was furnished to secure reimbursement and obtain continuing support.

(b) The right of the county to proceed on behalf of the parent or to obtain reimbursement is subject to any limitation otherwise imposed by the law of this state.

(c) The court may order the child to pay the county reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs in a proceeding by the county under this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4404.

In determining the amount to be ordered for support, the court shall consider the following circumstances of each party:

(a) Earning capacity and needs.

(b) Obligations and assets.

(c) Age and health.

(d) Standard of living.

(e) Other factors the court deems just and equitable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4405.

The court retains jurisdiction to modify or terminate an order for support where justice requires.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Relief from Duty to Support Parent Who Abandoned Child [4410. - 4414.]

4410.

An adult child may file a petition in the county where a parent of the child resides requesting that the court make an order freeing the petitioner from the obligation otherwise imposed by law to support the parent. If the parent does not reside in this state, the petition shall be filed in the county where the adult child resides.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4411.

The court shall make the order requested pursuant to Section 4410 only if the petition alleges and the court finds all of the following:

(a) The child was abandoned by the parent when the child was a minor.

(b) The abandonment continued for a period of two or more years before the time the child attained the age of 18 years.

(c) During the period of abandonment the parent was physically and mentally able to provide support for the child.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4412.

On the filing of a petition under this chapter, the clerk shall set the matter for hearing by the court and shall issue a citation, stating the time and place of the hearing, directed to the parent and to the parent’s conservator, if any, or, if the parent is deceased, the personal representative of the parent’s estate. At least five days before the date of the hearing, the citation and a copy of the petition shall be personally served on each person to whom it is directed, in the same manner as provided by law for the service of summons.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4413.

If the parent is a resident of this state, the court does not have jurisdiction to make an order under this chapter until 30 days after the county counsel, or the district attorney in a county not having a county counsel, of the county in which the parent resides has been served with notice of the pendency of the proceeding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4414.

(a) If, upon hearing, the court determines that the requirements of Section 4411 are satisfied, the court shall make an order that the petitioner is relieved from the obligation otherwise imposed by law to support the parent.

(b) An order under this section also releases the petitioner with respect to any state law under which a child is required to do any of the following:

(1) Pay for the support, care, maintenance, and the like of a parent.

(2) Reimburse the state or a local public agency for furnishing the support, care, maintenance, or the like of a parent.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. ENFORCEMENT OF SUPPORT ORDERS [4500. - 5616.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [4500. - 4508.]

4500.

An order for child, family, or spousal support that is made, entered, or enforceable in this state is enforceable under this code, whether or not the order was made or entered pursuant to this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4501.

A family support order is enforceable in the same manner and to the same extent as a child support order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4502.

The period for enforcement and procedure for renewal of a judgment or order for child, family, or spousal support is governed by Section 291.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 86, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

4503.

If a parent has been ordered to make payments for the support of a minor child, an action to recover an arrearage in those payments may be maintained at any time within the period otherwise specified for the enforcement of such a judgment, notwithstanding the fact that the child has attained the age of 18 years.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4504.

(a) If the noncustodial parent is receiving payments from the federal government pursuant to the Social Security Act or Railroad Retirement Act, or from the Department of Veterans Affairs because of the retirement or disability of the noncustodial parent and the noncustodial parent notifies the custodial person, or notifies the local child support agency in a case being enforced by the local child support agency pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, then the custodial parent or other child support obligee shall contact the appropriate federal agency within 30 days of receiving notification that the noncustodial parent is receiving those payments to verify eligibility for each child to receive payments from the federal government because of the disability of the noncustodial parent. If the child is potentially eligible for those payments,
 the custodial parent or other child support obligee shall apply for and cooperate with the appropriate federal agency for the receipt of those benefits on behalf of each child. The noncustodial parent shall cooperate with the custodial parent or other child support obligee in making that application and shall provide any information necessary to complete the application.

(b) If the court has ordered a noncustodial parent to pay for the support of a child, payments for the support of the child made by the federal government pursuant to the Social Security Act or Railroad Retirement Act, or by the Department of Veterans Affairs because of the retirement or disability of the noncustodial parent and received by the custodial parent or other child support obligee shall be credited toward the amount ordered by the court to be paid by the noncustodial parent for support of the child unless the payments made by the federal government were taken into consideration by the court in
 determining the amount of support to be paid. Any payments shall be credited in the order set forth in Section 695.221 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) If the custodial parent or other child support obligee refuses to apply for those benefits or fails to cooperate with the appropriate federal agency in completing the application but the child or children otherwise are eligible to receive those benefits, the noncustodial parent shall be credited toward the amount ordered by the court to be paid for that month by the noncustodial parent for support of the child or children in the amount of payment that the child or children would have received that month had the custodial parent or other child support obligee completed an application for the benefits if the noncustodial parent provides evidence to the local child support agency indicating the amount the child or children would have received. The credit for those payments shall continue until the child or children would no longer
 be eligible for those benefits or the order for child support for the child or children is no longer in effect, whichever occurs first.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 305, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

4505.

(a) A court may require a parent who alleges that the parent’s default in a child or family support order is due to the parent’s unemployment to submit to the appropriate child support enforcement agency or any other entity designated by the court, including, but not limited to, the court itself, each two weeks, or at a frequency deemed appropriate by the court, a list of at least five different places the parent has applied for employment.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2011.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section operative January 1, 2011, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.

(a) An abstract of a judgment ordering a party to pay spousal, child, or family support to the other party shall be certified by the clerk of the court where the judgment was entered and shall contain all of the following:

(1) The title of the court where the judgment is entered and the cause and number of the proceeding.

(2) The date of entry of the judgment and of any renewal of the judgment.

(3) Where the judgment and any renewals are entered in the records of the court.

(4) The name and last known address of the party ordered to
 pay support.

(5) The name and address of the party to whom support payments are ordered to be paid.

(6) Only the last four digits of the social security number, birth date, and driver’s license number of the party who is ordered to pay support. If any of those numbers are not known to the party to whom support payments are to be paid, that fact shall be indicated on the abstract of the court judgment. This paragraph shall not apply to documents created prior to January 1, 2010.

(7) Whether a stay of enforcement has been ordered by the court and, if so, the date the stay ends.

(8) The date of issuance of the abstract.

(9) Any other information deemed reasonable and appropriate by the
 Judicial Council.

(b) The Judicial Council may develop a form for an abstract of a judgment ordering a party to pay child, family, or spousal support to another party which contains the information required by subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a support obligation is being enforced pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, the agency enforcing the obligation may record a notice of support judgment. The notice of support judgment shall contain the same information as the form adopted by the Judicial Council pursuant to subdivision (b) and Section 4506.1. The notice of support judgment shall have the same force and effect as an abstract of judgment certified by the clerk of the court where the judgment was entered. The local child support agency or other Title IV-D agency shall not be subject to any civil liability as a consequence of
 causing a notice of support judgment to be recorded.

(d) As used in this section, “judgment” includes an order for child, family, or spousal support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 552, Sec. 3.   (SB 40)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a support obligation is being enforced pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, the agency enforcing the obligation may file and record an abstract of support judgment as authorized by Section 4506 and substitute the office address of the agency designated to receive support payments for the address of the party to whom support was ordered to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1269, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when a support obligation is being enforced pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, the agency enforcing the obligation may file and record a substitution of payee, if a judgment or abstract of judgment has previously been recorded pursuant to Section 697.320 of the Code of Civil Procedure by the support obligee or by a different governmental agency.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when the Title IV-D agency ceases enforcement of a support obligation at the request of the support obligee, the agency may file and record a substitution of payee, if a judgment or abstract of judgment has been previously recorded pursuant to Section 697.320 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(c) The substitution of payee shall contain all of the following:

(1) The name and address of the governmental agency or substituted payee
 filing the substitution and a notice that the substituted payee is to be contacted when notice to a lienholder may or must be given.

(2) The title of the court, the cause, and number of the proceeding where the substituted payee has registered the judgment.

(3) The name and last known address of the party ordered to pay support.

(4) The recorder identification number or book and page of the recorded document to which the substitution of payee applies.

(5) Any other information deemed reasonable and appropriate by the Judicial Council.

(d) The recorded substitution of payee shall not affect the priorities created by earlier recordations of support judgments or abstracts of support judgments. 

(e) An agency enforcing the support obligation pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act is not required to obtain prior court approval or a
 clerk’s certification when filing and recording a substitution of payee under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 599, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

4506.3.

The Judicial Council, in consultation with the California Family Support Council, the Department of Child Support Services, and title insurance industry representatives, shall develop a single form, which conforms with the requirements of Section 27361.6 of the Government Code, for the substitution of payee, for notice directing payment of support to the local child support agency pursuant to Section 4204, and for notice that support has been assigned pursuant to Section 11477 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The form shall be available no later than July 1, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 46.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

4507.

When a court orders a person to make payment for child support or family support, the court may order that individual to make that payment as provided in Section 1151.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 176, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4508.

(a) This section does not apply to any child support obligor who is subject to an earnings assignment order pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5200).

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (a), every order or judgment to pay child support may require a child support obligor to designate an account for the purpose of paying the child support obligation by electronic funds transfer, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6479.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The order or judgment may require the obligor to deposit funds in an interest-bearing account with a state or federally chartered commercial bank, a savings and loan association, or in shares of a federally insured credit union doing business in this state, and shall require the obligor to maintain funds in the account sufficient to pay the monthly child support obligation. The court may order that each payment be electronically transferred to either the obligee’s account
 or the local child support agency account. The obligor shall be required to notify the obligee if the depository institution or the account number is changed. No interest shall accrue on any amount subject to electronic funds transfer as long as funds are maintained in the account that are sufficient to pay the monthly child support obligation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 4.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Deposit of Money to Secure Future Child Support Payments [4550. - 4573.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4550. - 4554.]

4550.

“Child support obligee” as used in this chapter means either the parent, guardian, or other person to whom child support has been ordered to be paid or the local child support agency designated by the court to receive the payment. The local child support agency is the “child support obligee” for the purposes of this chapter for all cases in which an application for services has been filed under Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 5.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4551.

Except as provided in this section, this chapter:

(a) Does not apply to a temporary child support order.

(b) Applies to an application for modification of child support filed on or after January 1, 1992, but this chapter does not constitute the basis for the modification.

(c) Applies to an application for modification of child support in a case where the child support obligee has previously waived the establishment of a child support trust account pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4560 and now seeks the establishment of the child support trust account.

(d) Applies to an order or judgment entered by the court on or after January 1, 1993, ordering a child support obligor to pay a then existing child support arrearage that the child support obligor has unlawfully failed to pay as of the date of that order or judgment, including the arrearages which were incurred before
 January 1, 1992.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4552.

The Judicial Council shall promulgate such rules of court and publish such related judicial forms as the Judicial Council determines are necessary and appropriate to implement this chapter. In taking these steps, the Judicial Council shall ensure the uniform statewide application of this chapter and compliance with Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.) and any regulations promulgated thereunder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4553.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to permit any action or omission by the state or any of its political subdivisions that would place the state in noncompliance with any requirement of federal law, including, but not limited to, the state reimbursement requirements of Part D of Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 651 et seq.) and any regulations promulgated thereunder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4554.

This chapter applies notwithstanding any other law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Order for Deposit of Money [4560. - 4563.]

4560.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or in Article 3 (commencing with Section 4565), every order or judgment to pay child support may also require the payment by the child support obligor of up to one year’s child support or such lesser amount as is equal to the child support amount due to be paid by the child support obligor between the time of the date of the order and the date when the support obligation will be terminated by operation of law. This amount shall be known as the “child support security deposit.”

(b) Unless expressly waived by the child support obligee, the court may order the establishment of a child support trust account pursuant to this chapter in every proceeding in which a child support obligation is imposed by order of the court. Among other reasons, the court may decline to establish a child support trust account upon its finding that an adequately funded child support trust account already exists pursuant to
 this chapter for the benefit of the child or children involved in the proceeding or that the child support obligor has provided adequate alternative security which is equivalent to the child support security deposit otherwise required by this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4561.

If a child support security deposit is ordered, the court shall order that the moneys be deposited by the child support obligor in an interest-bearing account with a state or federally chartered commercial bank, a trust company authorized to transact trust business in this state, or a savings and loan association, or in shares of a federally insured credit union doing business in this state and having a trust department, subject to withdrawal only upon authorization of the court. The moneys so deposited shall be used exclusively to guarantee the monthly payment of child support.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4562.

The court shall also order that evidence of the deposit shall be provided by the child support obligor in the form specified by the court, which shall be served upon the child support obligee and filed with the court within a reasonable time specified by the court, not to exceed 30 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4563.

An account established pursuant to this chapter shall be dissolved and any remaining funds in the account shall be returned to the support obligor, with any interest earned thereon, upon the full payment and cessation of the child support obligation as provided by court order or operation of law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Application to Reduce or Eliminate Deposit [4565. - 4567.]

4565.

(a) Before entry of a child support order pursuant to Section 4560, the court shall give the child support obligor reasonable notice and opportunity to file an application to reduce or eliminate the child support security deposit on either of the following grounds:

(1) The obligor has provided adequate alternative equivalent security to assure timely payment of the amount required by Section 4560.

(2) The obligor is unable, without undue financial hardship, to pay the support deposit required by Section 4560.

(b) The application shall be supported by all reasonable and necessary financial and other information required by the court to establish the existence of either ground for relief.

(c) After the filing of an application, the child support obligor shall also serve the application and supporting financial and other information submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) upon the child support obligee and any other party to the proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 441, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

4566.

Upon the filing of an application under Section 4565 with the court and the service of the application upon the child support obligee and any other party to the proceedings, the court shall provide notice and opportunity for any party opposing the application to file responsive financial and other information setting forth the factual and legal bases for the party’s opposition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4567.

The court shall then provide an opportunity for hearing, and shall thereafter enter its order exercising its discretion under all the facts and circumstances as disclosed in the admissible evidence before it so as to maximize the payment and deposit of the amount required by Section 4560, or an equivalent adequate security for the payment thereof, without imposition of undue financial hardship on the support obligor. If the court finds that the deposit of the amount required by Section 4560 would impose an undue financial hardship upon the child support obligor, the court shall reduce this amount to an amount that the child support obligor can pay as the child support security deposit without undue financial hardship.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Use of Deposit to Make Delinquent Support Payment [4570. - 4573.]

4570.

(a) Upon the application of the child support obligee stating that the support payment is 10 or more days late, the court shall immediately order disbursement of funds from the account established pursuant to this chapter solely for the purpose of providing the amount of child support then in arrears.

(b) Funds so disbursed shall be used exclusively for the support, maintenance, and education of the child or children subject to the child support order.

(c) The court shall also order the account to be replenished by the child support obligor in the same amounts as are expended from the account to pay the amount of child support which the child support obligor has failed to pay the child support obligee in a timely manner.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4571.

The court shall cause a copy of the application, as well as its order to disburse and replenish funds, to be served upon the child support obligor, who shall be subject to contempt of court for failure to comply with the order.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4572.

The court shall cause a copy of its order to disburse and replenish funds to be served upon the depository institution where the child support security deposit is maintained, and upon the child support agency with jurisdiction over the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 755, Sec. 6.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4573.

If support is ordered to be paid through the local child support agency on behalf of a child not receiving public assistance pursuant to the Family Economic Security Act of 1982 (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the local child support agency shall forward the support received pursuant to this chapter to the custodial parent or other person having care or control of the child or children involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 808, Sec. 47.   Effective September 28, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Deposit of Assets to Secure Future Child Support Payments [4600. - 4641.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [4600. - 4604.]

4600.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide an extraordinary remedy for cases of bad faith failure to pay child support obligations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4601.

“Deposit holder” as used in this chapter means the district attorney, county officer, or trustee designated by the court to receive assets deposited pursuant to this chapter to secure future support payments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4602.

If requested by an obligor-parent, the deposit holder shall prepare a statement setting forth disbursements and receipts made under this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4603.

The deposit holder who is responsible for any money or property and for any disbursements under this chapter is not liable for any action undertaken in good faith and in conformance with this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4604.

(a) If the deposit holder incurs fees or costs under this chapter which are not compensated by the deduction under subdivision (c) of Section 4630 (including, but not limited to, fees or costs incurred in a sale of assets pursuant to this chapter and in the preparation of a statement pursuant to Section 4602), the court shall, after a hearing, order the obligor-parent to pay the reasonable fees and costs incurred by the deposit holder. The hearing shall be held not less than 20 days after the deposit holder serves notice of motion or order to show cause upon the obligor-parent.

(b) Fees and costs ordered to be paid under this section shall be in addition to any deposit made under this chapter but shall not exceed whichever of the following is less:

(1) Five percent of one year’s child support obligation.

(2) The total amount ordered deposited under Section 4614.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Order for Deposit of Assets [4610. - 4617.]

4610.

(a) Subject to Sections 4613, 4614, and 4615, in any proceeding where the court has ordered either or both parents to pay any amount for the support of a child for whom support may be ordered, upon an order to show cause or notice of motion, application, and declaration signed under penalty of perjury by the person or county officer to whom support has been ordered to have been paid stating that the parent or parents so ordered is in arrears in payment in a sum equal to the amount of 60 days of payments, the court shall issue to the parent or parents ordered to pay support, following notice and opportunity for a hearing, an order requiring that the parent or parents deposit assets to secure future support payments with the deposit holder designated by the court.

(b) In a proceeding under this article, upon request of any party, the court may also issue an ex parte restraining order as specified in Section 4620.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 145.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4611.

In a proceeding under this chapter, an obligor-parent shall rebut both of the following presumptions:

(a) The nonpayment of child support was willful, without good faith.

(b) The obligor had the ability to pay the support.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1992, Ch. 162, Sec. 10.   Operative January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

4612.

An obligor-parent alleged to be in arrears may use any of the following grounds as a defense to the motion filed pursuant to this article or as a basis for filing a motion to stop a sale or use of assets under Section 4631:

(a) Child support payments are not in arrears.

(b) Laches.

(c) There has been a change in the custody of the children.
